Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.567

Early therapeutic and preventative services and programs.

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department shall administer early therapeutic and preventative services and programs, such as the early childhood intervention and prevention services program, and other related services for children who are:

(a) Between the ages of birth and five years; and

(b) Referred by a child welfare worker, a department of social and health services social worker, a primary care physician, a behavioral health provider, or a public health nurse due to: (i) Risk of child abuse or neglect; (ii) exposure to complex trauma; or (iii) significant developmental delays.

(2) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department shall make all reasonable efforts to deliver early therapeutic and preventative services and programs statewide. These services and programs must focus first on children and families furthest from opportunity as defined by income and be delivered by programs that emphasize greater racial equity.

[ 2021 c 199 s 405.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2021 c 199 ss 402-405: See note following RCW 43.216.577.

Short title—Findings—Intent—Conflict with federal requirements—2021 c 199: See notes following RCW 43.216.770.